Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 15A Justice and Public Safety Cabinet
15A.080.
Interrelationship of offices for administrative purposes.

The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall be attached to the office of the commissioner, Department of Criminal Justice Training for administrative purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 9; 1976, ch. 62, § 11; 1978, ch. 155, § 16, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 343, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 64, § 5, effective July 15, 1986.

15A.090.
Internal organization.

The secretary shall establish the internal organization of the cabinet not otherwise established by the Governor or the General Assembly and shall organize the cabinet into such organizational units as the secretary deems necessary to perform the functions, powers, and duties of the cabinet, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 12.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 10; 2007, ch. 85, § 45, effective June 26, 2007.

15A.100.
Power and authority of secretary in performing functions of cabinet — Deputy.

The secretary shall have any and all necessary power and authority, subject to appropriate provisions of the statutes, to create such positions and to employ the necessary personnel in such positions to enable the secretary to perform the functions of the cabinet. The secretary shall designate a person to act as deputy for him in the exercise of his duties in his absence.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 11.

15A.110.
Assistants to secretary.

All appointments to positions not in the classified service shall be made pursuant to KRS

12.050

and such appointees shall be major assistants to the secretary and shall assist in the development of policy.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 12.

15A.120.
Transfer of functions to cabinet. [Repealed.]

15A.130.
Transfer of funds, credits, assets, etc., to cabinet. [Repealed.]

15A.140.
Existing rules and regulations effective until modified or repealed. [Repealed.]

15A.150.
Administering of programs and grants.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the cabinet shall administer all state programs and all state and federally funded grant programs related to criminal justice.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 16.

15A.160.
Promulgation of administrative regulations — Administration of laws and cabinet functions.

The secretary may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A and direct proceedings and actions for the administration of all laws and functions which are vested in the cabinet, except laws and functions vested in the Department of Public Advocacy.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 17; 1982, ch. 343, § 10, effective July 15, 1982; 2007, ch. 85, § 46, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 167, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/26/2007). Although 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 46, contains a reference to the “Department of Public Advocacy,” the entity created by 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, secs. 7 and 40, and Executive Order 2006-805 is the “Department for Public Advocacy.” In accordance with 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 335, and KRS

7.136

, the erroneous reference in this section has been corrected in codification.

(10/5/90). Pursuant to KRS 7.136(1), KRS Chapter 13A has been substituted for the prior reference to KRS Chapter 13 in this statute. The sections in KRS Chapter 13 were repealed by 1984 Ky. Acts ch. 417, § 36 and KRS Chapter 13A was created in that same chapter of the 1984 Ky. Acts.

15A.170.
Administrative support services — Other related programs. [Repealed.]

15A.180.
Retention and protection of reports, documents, records, etc. [Repealed.]

15A.190.
Uniform reporting forms to provide statistical information on crimes.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, in consultation with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Kentucky Commission on Women, and any other agency concerned with particular acts of criminal activity, shall:

Design, print, and distribute to all law enforcement agencies in the Commonwealth, a uniform reporting form which provides statistical information relating to the crimes involving domestic violence, child abuse, victimization of the elderly, including but not limited to elder abuse, neglect, and exploitation and other crimes against the elderly, or any other particular area of criminal activity deemed by the secretary of justice and public safety to require research as to its frequency; and

Provide that the information required in KRS

209A.122

be included in the uniform reporting form.

The provision of subsection (1) of this section concerning the distribution of forms shall become effective on January 1, 2006.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 367, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 426, § 71, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 86, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 132, § 13, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 47, effective June 26, 2007; 2022 ch. 224, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 8, (1) at 1638.

15A.195.
Prohibition against racial profiling — Model policy — Local law enforcement agencies’ policies.

No state law enforcement agency or official shall stop, detain, or search any person when such action is solely motivated by consideration of race, color, or ethnicity, and the action would constitute a violation of the civil rights of the person.

The secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, in consultation with the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, the Attorney General, the Department of Criminal Justice Training, the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, the Department of Kentucky State Police, the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet, and the secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet, shall design and implement a model policy to prohibit racial profiling by state law enforcement agencies and officials.

The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall disseminate the established model policy against racial profiling to all sheriffs and local law enforcement officials, including local police departments, city councils, and fiscal courts. All local law enforcement agencies and sheriffs’ departments are urged to implement a written policy against racial profiling or adopt the model policy against racial profiling as established by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet within one hundred eighty (180) days of dissemination of the model policy. A copy of any implemented or adopted policy against racial profiling shall be filed with the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council and the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program Fund.

Each local law enforcement agency that participates in the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund under KRS

15.420

in the Commonwealth shall implement a policy banning the practice of racial profiling that meets or exceeds the requirements of the model policy disseminated under subsection (3) of this section. The local law enforcement agency’s policy shall be submitted by the local law enforcement agency to the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet within one hundred eighty (180) days of dissemination of the model policy by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council under subsection (3) of this section. If the local law enforcement agency fails to submit its policy within one hundred eighty (180) days of dissemination of the model policy, or the secretary rejects a policy submitted within the one hundred and eighty (180) days, that agency shall not receive Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program funding until the secretary approves a policy submitted by the agency.

If the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet approves a local law enforcement agency’s policy, the agency shall not change its policy without obtaining approval of the new policy from the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet. If the agency changes its policy without obtaining the secretary’s approval, the agency shall not receive Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program funding until the secretary approves a policy submitted by the agency.

Each local law enforcement agency shall adopt an administrative action for officers found not in compliance with the agency’s policy. The administrative action shall be in accordance with other penalties enforced by the agency’s administration for similar officer misconduct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 158, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2007, ch. 85, § 48, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 19, effective July 15, 2010.

15A.197.
Justice and Public Safety Cabinet may provide state personnel, property, and resources to Trooper Island, the Kentucky State Police Foundation, and the Kentucky Law Enforcement Memorial Foundation.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet and its agencies may provide state personnel, state property, and state resources to Trooper Island Incorporated, the Kentucky State Police Foundation, and the Kentucky Law Enforcement Memorial Foundation.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 290, § 3, effective April 9, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 49, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 186, § 1, effective April 11, 2017; 2019 ch. 123, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.